Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.3993, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. The definitions in this section apply to sections 473.3993 to deleted text begin 473.3997deleted text end new text begin 473.3999new text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.3999, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notice to legislature. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "reference date" means the earliest date on which a light rail transit project has: new text end new text begin (1) a total project cost estimate; new text end new text begin (2) a schedule that includes an estimated date for substantial completion of construction; and new text end new text begin (3) federal approval to enter the engineering phase or has commenced similar final design activities. new text end new text begin (b) For a light rail transit project, a responsible authority must submit a notification to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance within seven calendar days of a determination that: new text end new text begin (1) the total project cost estimate is increased or expected to increase by five percent or more above the total project cost estimate (i) most recently specified, or (ii) specified as of the reference date; or new text end new text begin (2) the anticipated substantial completion date is delayed by six months or more beyond the completion date (i) most recently specified, or (ii) specified as of the reference date. new text end new text begin (c) At a minimum, the notification must include an overview of the project cost estimate and schedule and an explanation of the reasons for a change in project cost, delay, or both. new text end new text begin (d) The requirements in this subdivision apply to a light rail transit project for which a reference date is applicable. new text end